Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2610
Consumer reporting agency; changes to official information in file; written confirmation required; exceptions.

If a security freeze is in place, a consumer reporting agency may not change any of the following official information in a file without sending a written confirmation of the change to the consumer, protected consumer, or representative within thirty days after the change is made: Name, date of birth, social security number, and address. In the case of an address change, the written confirmation shall be sent to both the new address and the former address. Written confirmation is not required for technical modifications of a consumer's or protected consumer's official information, including name and street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers or letters.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 14.